Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 3

Notes and Bonds [Repealed]

6-34-301 — 6-34-317. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 6-34-301 — 6-34-317 (Acts 1957, ch. 238, §§ 6.19-6.34; 1963, ch. 186, § 1; 1969, ch. 43, § 1; 1972, ch. 740, § 4(59); 1982, ch. 580, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 6-3410 — 6-3426), concerning notes and bonds, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 9.